Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
HOUSING FOR ELDERS AND TEACHERS

A. Housing
for Elders

[§356D-71] Resident selection; dwelling
units; rentals. In the administration of elder or elderly housing, the
authority shall observe the following with regard to resident selection, dwelling
units, and rentals:

(1) Except as provided in this section, the authority
shall accept elder or elderly households as residents in the housing projects;

(2) It may accept as residents in any dwelling unit
one or more persons, related or unrelated by blood or marriage. It may also
accept as a resident in any dwelling unit or in any housing project, in the
case of illness or other disability of an elder who is a resident in the
dwelling unit or in the project, a person designated by the elder as the
elder's live-in aide whose qualifications as a live-in aide are verified by the
authority, although the person is not an elder; provided that the person shall
cease to be a resident therein upon the recovery of, or removal from the
project of, the elder;

(3) It may rent or lease to an elder a dwelling unit
consisting of any number of rooms as the authority deems necessary or advisable
to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed resident or
residents without overcrowding;

(4) Notwithstanding that the elder has no written
rental agreement or that the agreement has expired, during hospitalization of
the elder due to illness or other disability so long as the elder continues to
tender the usual rent to the authority or proceeds to tender receipts for rent
lawfully withheld, no action or proceeding to recover possession of the
dwelling unit may be maintained against the elder, nor shall the authority
otherwise cause the elder to quit the dwelling unit involuntarily, demand an
increase in rent from the elder, or decrease the services to which the elder
has been entitled; and

(5) Elder or elderly housing shall be subject to
chapter 521. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next